California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 25, Sec. 31.   (AB 1603)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18922.

(a) On or before July 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a request for a federal waiver to waive the provisions of Section 273.9(b) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or any other federal law, regulation, or guidance, to exclude the basic allowance for housing provided to uniformed service members pursuant to Section 403 of Title 37 of the United States Code from countable income in the determination of eligibility and benefit level for purposes of receiving CalFresh benefits.

(b) Upon federal approval of the waiver, the department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, advocates for CalFresh recipients, and the Military Department, shall issue an all-county letter
 instructing counties on updated eligibility requirements and benefit calculations for uniformed service members receiving a basic allowance for housing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 877, Sec. 1.   (SB 950)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18923.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall submit a request to the United States Department of Agriculture for a waiver to permit a CalFresh household to retain funds in the restricted savings account as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11155.2 and as accumulated while participating in the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program. The participation requirements for this specific savings account as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11155.2 shall apply to CalFresh. Penalties for nonqualifying withdrawal of these funds shall result in a calculation of a period of ineligibility for all persons in the CalFresh household, to be determined by dividing the balance in the account immediately prior to the withdrawal by the
 CalFresh allotment to which the household is entitled. The resulting whole number shall be the number of months of ineligibility. The period of ineligibility may be reduced when the divisor, which is the CalFresh allotment, increases as a result of a cost-of-living adjustment.

(b) The director may waive, with federal approval, the enforcement of specific federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program requirements, regulations, and standards necessary to implement this provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 92.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18924.

(a) To the extent permitted by federal law, waiver, demonstration project, or other federal authority, the department shall allow counties to utilize existing information maintained by the federal Social Security Administration regarding low-income social security benefit recipients, to simplify enrollment into the CalFresh program administered pursuant to this chapter, provided that an interested county has either the existing capacity to receive that information, or the ability to adapt its existing automation systems without significant changes or costs to the state or county.

(b) The department shall support enrollment efforts pursuant to this section by doing all of the following:

(1) Working with the Social Security Administration to target social security recipients 60 years of age and older whose income and other factors are likely to qualify them for aid through CalFresh.

(2) Developing a streamlined application and simplified enrollment process for likely eligible recipients, which may include strategies used by other states to reduce paperwork and increase federal nutrition benefits, including, but not limited to, self-certification of key eligibility factors, standardization of benefits and deductions, and automation of the application process.

(3) Seeking waivers, grants, or other federal authority and support
 necessary to implement this section.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 502, Sec. 2.   (AB 69)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative July 1, 2012, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18925.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services, in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services, shall implement a simplified eligibility process as part of CalFresh to expedite Medi-Cal program and Healthy Families Program enrollment for CalFresh recipients, including children and their eligible parents or caretaker relatives who are not enrolled in those programs.

(b) Each county welfare department shall develop a data list of family members residing in eligible CalFresh households who are not enrolled in the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program.

(c) The county welfare department shall
 develop a notice informing individuals identified pursuant to subdivision (b) that they may be entitled to receive benefits under the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program.

(d) At the time of the CalFresh household’s annual recertification, the county welfare department shall send the notice specified in subdivision (c) to the individuals identified in subdivision (b). The notice shall include a request for permission to use the information in the CalFresh recipient’s case file to make a determination of eligibility for the Medi-Cal program and the Healthy Families Program.

(e) The notice shall be written in culturally and linguistically appropriate language and at an appropriate literacy level. The notice shall include information on the Medi-Cal program and the Healthy Families Program, and a telephone number that CalFresh recipients may call for additional
 information.

(f) To apply for medical assistance under the Medi-Cal program, the CalFresh recipient shall sign, date, and return the notice requesting that an eligibility determination be made. Upon receipt of the notice, the county welfare department shall make an eligibility determination by utilizing the information in the CalFresh recipient’s case file or paper application. The Medi-Cal application date shall be the date the notice is received by the county welfare department. If the CalFresh case file does not include sufficient information to establish Medi-Cal program eligibility, the county welfare department shall request, either orally or in writing, additional information from the CalFresh recipient.

(g) If the CalFresh recipient is determined to be eligible to participate in the Medi-Cal program with a share of cost, or is determined to be ineligible for Medi-Cal,
 information pertinent to the CalFresh recipient’s eligibility for the Healthy Families Program shall be forwarded by the county welfare department to the Healthy Families Program statewide administrator for immediate processing. If there is insufficient information to establish Healthy Families Program eligibility, the administrator shall request, either orally or in writing, additional information from the CalFresh recipient.

(h) Counties shall include the cost of implementing this section in their annual administrative budget requests to the State Department of Health Care Services.

(i) This section shall be implemented on or after July 1, 2003, but only to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 93.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18926.

(a) (1) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department shall annually seek a federal waiver of the existing federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program limitation that stipulates that an able-bodied adult without dependents (ABAWD) participant is limited to three months of CalFresh benefits in a three-year period unless that participant has met the work participation requirement or is otherwise exempt.

(2) For purposes of this section, “ABAWD participant” includes a parent or other member of a household with responsibility for a dependent child 14 years of age or older as a result of federal H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21), signed by United States President
 Donald J. Trump on July 4, 2025.

(b) All eligible counties shall be included in and bound by this waiver.

(c) At its option, when a county is not eligible for a countywide waiver, a county may request that the department apply for the waiver described in subdivision (a) for one or more eligible subareas of the county. The department shall seek the subarea waiver within a reasonable timeframe following a request made by a county, and may seek any necessary information from the county to support the waiver request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 310, Sec. 4.   (AB 2765)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18926.1.

(a) To the extent not prohibited by federal law and guidance, the department shall ensure that all recipients subject to the federal ABAWD time limit described in Section 18926 are permitted to meet the work requirements of the time limit through all forms of work, including, but not limited to, volunteer work at a nonprofit organization or a public institution that the recipient chooses, if the county can verify the hours of participation using the process established by the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) On or before January 1, 2018, the department, with input from the County Welfare Directors Association and advocates for CalFresh recipients, shall issue an all-county letter instructing counties as to how to verify hours of the
 volunteer work specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 55.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18926.2.

To the extent not prohibited by federal law and guidance, a recipient who is homeless shall be deemed to be exempt from the federal ABAWD time limit described in Section 18926. For purposes of this section, a recipient who is homeless is a person who does not have a regular nighttime residence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 56.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18926.5.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, “CalFresh Employment and Training program” or “CalFresh E&T” means the program established under Section 6(d)(4)(B) of the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2015), Section 273.7 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and associated administrative notices published by the United States Department of Agriculture with the purpose of assisting members of CalFresh households in gaining skills, training, work, or experience that will increase their ability to obtain regular employment.

(b) (1) A county that elects to participate in the CalFresh Employment and Training (CalFresh E&T) program, as authorized by the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2015),
 shall screen CalFresh work registrants to determine whether they will participate in, or be deferred from, CalFresh E&T. If deferred, a CalFresh work registrant may request to enroll in CalFresh E&T as a voluntary participant. An individual shall be deferred from a mandatory placement in CalFresh E&T if he or she satisfies any of the criteria in Sections 273.7 and 273.24 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if he or she resides in a federally determined work surplus area, if he or she is a veteran who has been honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces, if he or she is a victim of domestic violence, or if he or she is subject to the able-bodied adult without dependents (ABAWD) time limit pursuant to Section 18926.

(2) For purposes of this section, “deferred” has the same meaning as exempt.

(c) (1) A county participating in
 CalFresh E&T shall be required to demonstrate in its CalFresh E&T plan how it is effectively using CalFresh E&T funds for each of the components that the county offers, which may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Self-initiated workfare.

(B) Work experience or training.

(C) Education.

(D) Job search.

(E) Job search training.

(F) Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act activities.

(G) Self-employment training.

(H) Job retention.

(I) Subsidized employment, as set forth in subdivision (d).

(J) (i) The support services or client reimbursements needed to participate in subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive, as allowed by federal and state law and guidance.

(ii) The department shall issue guidance to counties participating in CalFresh E&T with instructions for providing support services or client reimbursements pursuant to this subparagraph. The guidance shall include, but not be limited to, instructions for reimbursing a proportion of the cost of Internet service or telephone service.

(2) This section does not require a county to offer a particular component as a part of its CalFresh E&T plan.

(d) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department shall seek a federal waiver that would allow 50-percent federal reimbursement for eligible CalFresh E&T activities to be used to provide a wage subsidy for ABAWD participants in counties that do not participate in the waiver of the ABAWD time limit pursuant to Section 18926.

(e) This section does not limit a county’s ability to condition the receipt of nonmedical benefits under Section 17000 on an individual’s participation in an employment and training or workfare program of the county’s choice, even if that program is financed in whole or in part with CalFresh E&T funds or match funds.

(f) This section does not restrict the use of federal funds for the financing of CalFresh E&T programs.

(g) This section does not require a county to
 provide for workers’ compensation coverage for a CalFresh E&T participant. Notwithstanding Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code, a CalFresh E&T participant is not an employee for the purposes of workers’ compensation coverage, and a county has no duty to provide workers’ compensation coverage for a CalFresh E&T participant.

(h) This section does not prevent the department from entering into an agreement with an organization, institution, or agency, and, subject to approval of the state’s employment and training plan by the United States Department of Agriculture, from acting as the state entity for receipt of employment and training reimbursement from/through the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program on behalf of the organization, institution, or agency.

(i) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act
 (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement this section by all-county letters or similar instructions. The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section by January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 381, Sec. 1.   (AB 1892)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18926.6.

In a county that elects to participate in the CalFresh E&T program, a veteran applying for CalFresh benefits who is required to register to work, but who is exempt from mandatory placement in the CalFresh E&T program pursuant to Section 18926.5, shall be given the opportunity to participate as a volunteer in the CalFresh E&T program, and shall be provided with a referral to the
 local county veterans service office and a referral to veterans’ assistance and job training agencies, if those veterans’ assistance and job training agencies are known to the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 283, Sec. 3.   (SB 134)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

18926.7.

(a) (1) To the extent permitted under federal law, the department may contract directly with an entity that provides services on a regional or statewide basis and that has expertise in, and secures funds for, CalFresh E&T program services provided to participants that are allowable for partial federal reimbursement.

(2) The department may act as the state entity for receipt of federal reimbursement on behalf of the entity, provided that the entity complies with state and federal contracting requirements and the entity serves participants who face multiple barriers to employment and offers evidence-based skills development that results in a demonstrable increase in employment rates and earnings from work. The entity may include, but is not
 limited to, any of the following:

(A) An employment social enterprise.

(B) A private nonprofit.

(C) A public postsecondary educational institution, or other state or local agency.

(D) An organization serving as an intermediary for an entity described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, and the department.

(b) The department shall seek any county consultation necessary to implement subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, coordination with counties that have contracts in place pursuant to subdivision (c), or counties that are considering entering into contracts pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (a), a county may contract with an employment social enterprise or designated intermediary to provide services to its CalFresh E&T program participants. The department shall, no later than June 1, 2018, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, issue guidance instructing counties that elect to participate in CalFresh E&T program services of any special considerations for partnering with employment social enterprises in the development or implementation of their county CalFresh E&T programs.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, “employment social enterprise” means a social purpose corporation, a benefit corporation, or a nonprofit corporation that earns 51 percent or more of its enterprise revenue from production or assembly of goods or the provision of services and that demonstrates evidence of its mission to provide employment with on-the-job and life skills training to a
 direct labor force, not including supervisors, administrators, and trainers, that is comprised of 80 percent or more participants who face multiple barriers to employment.

(2) For purposes of this section, “participant who faces multiple barriers to employment” means any of the following individuals:

(A) An individual with employment barriers who is a member of at least two of the groups listed under subdivision (j) of Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(B) An individual who is or has been a homeless individual, as defined in Section 254b of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(C) An individual who is an out-of-school youth, as defined in Section 3164(a)(1)(B) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 381, Sec. 2.   (AB 1892)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18926.8.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the CalFresh E&T Workers’ Compensation Fund for the purpose of paying workers’ compensation claims resulting from CalFresh recipients’ participation in the CalFresh E&T program. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds deposited and maintained under this section are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the State Department of Social Services for the payment of workers’ compensation claims to CalFresh E&T participants.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, income generated from the Surplus Money Investment Fund during any fiscal year shall be credited to the CalFresh E&T Workers’ Compensation Fund.

(c) In the event of an amendment to the law requiring abolition of the fund, all remaining funds shall be returned to the Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 82.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

18927.

(a) Current and future CalFresh benefits shall be reduced in accordance with subdivisions (c) and (d) to recover an overissuance caused by intentional program violation, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 273.16 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, fraud, or inadvertent household error.

(b) Current and future CalFresh benefits shall be reduced in accordance with subdivisions (c) and (d) to recover an overissuance caused by administrative error if required by federal law or if the overissuance exceeds one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), or a higher amount that is approved by the United States Department of Agriculture. Any higher amount shall be implemented when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this provision.

(c) A household’s CalFresh benefits shall not be reduced to recover an overissuance as required or authorized by subdivision (a) or (b) unless the household receives adequate and timely notice of the overissuance, including, but not limited to, the budget worksheet that includes the amount and calculation of the overissuance and the reason for the overissuance.

(d) (1) In recovering an overissuance caused by
 administrative error, a recipient household’s monthly CalFresh benefits shall not be reduced by more than 5 percent of the household’s monthly CalFresh benefits or ten dollars ($10), whichever is greater, unless the recipient elects for the benefits to be reduced at a higher rate.

(2) In recovering an overissuance caused by inadvertent household error, a recipient household’s monthly CalFresh benefits shall not be reduced by more than 10 percent of the household’s monthly CalFresh benefits or ten dollars ($10), whichever is greater.

(3) In recovering an overissuance caused by intentional program violation, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 273.16 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or fraud, a recipient household’s monthly CalFresh benefits shall be reduced by 20 percent of the household’s monthly CalFresh benefit or twenty dollars ($20), whichever is
 greater.

(e) If a household is no longer receiving CalFresh benefits, a CalFresh overissuance caused by administrative error or inadvertent household error shall not be established, and collection shall not be attempted, if the overissuance is less than four hundred dollars ($400), or a higher amount that is approved by the United States Department of Agriculture. Any higher amount shall be implemented when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this provision.

(f) (1) No later than January 1, 2021, the department shall develop a policy for compromising administrative error claims, in whole or in part, for households that include at least one elderly or disabled member, including, but not limited to, recipients of Supplemental Security Income benefits.

(2) The department will implement the policy specified in paragraph (1) on December 31, 2023, or when implementation
 of the single Statewide Automated Welfare System automation is confirmed, whichever is later.

(g) If a household is no longer receiving CalFresh benefits, collection shall be attempted if the overissuance is caused by inadvertent household error and the overissuance is equal to or greater than the amount established for overissuances caused by administrative error, as specified in subdivision (e). All overissuances caused by intentional program violation, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 273.16 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or fraud shall be collected as required by federal law.

(h) When an overissuance collection is attempted, reasonable cost-effective methods of collection shall be implemented. The department shall define reasonable cost-effective collection methods, which shall include adequate and timely notice of the overissuance, including, but not
 limited to, all of the following:

(1) The amount and calculation of, and reason for, the overissuance.

(2) A statement of the monetary threshold described in this subdivision.

(3) Information about how to appeal the overissuance.

(4) Instructions for timely commencement of repayment.

(5) Consequences of delinquent payment.

(i) Nothing in this section shall prevent a county from writing off or terminating an overissuance claim when it meets the provisions of paragraph (8) of subdivision (e) of Section 273.18 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or as otherwise authorized by the United States Department of Agriculture or federal law.

(j) Nothing in this section shall prevent a county or the state from collecting all overissuances that are identified during a quality control review, as required by Section 275.12 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(k) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement this section through all-county letters or similar instructions from the director no later than January 1, 2014, to allow for automation updates required by this section
 to be made in coordination with other scheduled updates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 91.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18927.1.

(a) A county shall establish a claim to recover an overissuance of CalFresh benefits due to inadvertent household error, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 273.18 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or administrative error for which 24 months or fewer have elapsed between the month the overissuance occurred and the month the county welfare department determined the overissuance occurred. A county shall not establish a claim to recover an overissuance due to inadvertent household error or administrative error for which more than 24 months have elapsed between the month the overissuance occurred and the month the county welfare department determined the overissuance occurred.

(b) A claim established pursuant to this section
 shall equal the total amount of overissuance during the 24 months immediately preceding the date the overissuance due to the inadvertent household error or administrative error was discovered. A county shall not collect any portion of an overissuance that occurred more than 24 months before the date the county discovered the overissuance.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022, or upon the department’s notification to the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(d) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions, which
 shall have the same force and effect as regulations, until regulations are adopted.

(e) The department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than January 1, 2023. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, any emergency regulation previously adopted pursuant to this section. The initial adoption of regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of
 Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State, and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 85.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Conditionally operative July 1, 2022, or later date, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18927.5.

(a) A county human services agency shall notify the department when a mass overissuance has been identified, and include information in the notification as to whether the mass overissuance is known to have been caused by either of the following:

(1) Negligence or fraud on the part of the county human services agency in the certification of applicant households, as defined by subdivision (h) of Section 2020 of Title 7 of the United States Code.

(2) A major systemic error by the state or county human services agency, as defined by paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 2022 of Title 7 of the
 United States Code. 

(b) For purposes of this section, “mass overissuance” means an overissuance that is caused by the same action or inaction and impacts either 8 percent of the county CalFresh caseload, or more than 1,000 CalFresh households within the county, whichever is greater.

(c) The department shall report mass overissuances to the United States Department of Agriculture, Food and Nutrition Service, as required by
 federal law and guidance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 388, Sec. 2.   (SB 278)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

18928.

For the purpose of maximizing the anti-hunger impact of Section 66027.8 of the Education Code, the department shall consult with stakeholders, including legislative staff, representatives of counties, CalFresh eligibility workers, representatives from each segment of public postsecondary education, advocates for CalFresh recipients, and other stakeholders as identified by the department, with the goals of improving coordination between the segments of public postsecondary education and CalFresh administering agencies and improving access to CalFresh for low-income public postsecondary students. To the extent possible, this consultation shall take place through existing workgroups convened by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 323.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18928.5.

(a) No later than January 1, 2024, in order to assist in monitoring information about access to the CalFresh program by students enrolled in an institution of higher education, the department shall publish data specific to students’ receipt of CalFresh benefits on the department’s existing CalFresh Data Dashboard.

(b) The data shall include metrics about student applications, demographics, and exemptions as available through existing data sources, and shall exclude any personally identifiable information.

(c) The department shall
 update the dashboard on an annual basis and as additional data become available about the
 population described in subdivision (a).

(d) For purposes of this section, “enrolled in an institution of higher education” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 273.5 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 168, Sec. 1.   (AB 928)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18928.6.

(a) In order to support access to CalFresh and other nutrition programs, to accurately determine eligibility and benefit amounts, to effectively deploy funding to support county welfare departments’ implementation and operation of program requirements, and to complement federal and state performance measures, including, but not limited to, access, timeliness, and accuracy measures, the department shall utilize information related to the measures identified in subdivision (b) that is necessary to assess performance of, monitor the efficacy and impact of administrative funding of, facilitate technical assistance with county welfare departments related to, and inform the public about service delivery in, the CalFresh program.

(b) Information
 utilized pursuant to this section shall be limited to information related to client, eligibility worker, and administrator experiences, case processing, and the operations of automation systems.

(c) The department shall prioritize the use of existing data and administrative information before requesting or requiring additional information from counties. The information shall support the state and county welfare departments’ efforts to mitigate the impacts of Public Law 119-21 on clients, county welfare departments, and the state, including information that supports eligible people receiving the benefits they are entitled to and minimizes benefit cost sharing by reducing the state’s payment error rate.

(d) In consultation with county welfare departments, the County Welfare Directors Association of California (CWDA), the recognized exclusive representatives of eligibility workers,
 the California Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) Consortium, and other stakeholders, as identified by the department, the department shall define the information and processes necessary to meet the goals identified in subdivisions (a) and (c), including the specification of data elements, system tables, or other information, as well as describe the processes to obtain the information, including defining the form of the data and the methods of delivery, and the circumstances under which an extension may be granted pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) The county welfare departments and CalSAWS Consortium shall provide the information and access to necessary data identified by the department pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d), to the extent the information is available, and is not legally prohibited from being shared, including the provision of any relevant information or data that may be held by a contractor performing services for the
 county welfare department, to the extent permitted under existing contracts. Once the department has communicated a data or information need to a county welfare department or to CalSAWS, production of information or data shall begin for recurring instances, and be completed for one-time instances, within no more than 60 days of the department’s request, unless the department grants an extension of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 34.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18929.

To the extent permitted by federal law, regulation, or a waiver of a federal law or regulation, a county shall determine that good cause exists for purposes of the work requirement specified in Section 273.7(a)(1)(vii) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations if an applicant or recipient has voluntarily quit a job or reduced work hours based on at least one of the reasons enumerated in subdivision (a) of Section 11320.31, or because the scheduled work hours were so unpredictable that they did not allow the applicant or recipient to anticipate the amount of monthly income from the job. If the applicant or recipient reports refusing any offer of employment, reducing hours, voluntarily quitting any employment, or being discharged from any employment, the county human services agency shall provide the applicant or recipient with information regarding
 workplace rights generally, including information about how to file complaints with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement and the Civil Rights Department. This information shall be provided pursuant to the instructions developed by the workgroup specified in subdivision (d) of Section 11320.31.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 234.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.1. Food Assistance Program for Legal Immigrants [18930. - 18935.]

18930.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall establish a Food Assistance Program to provide assistance for those persons described in subdivision (b). The department shall enter into an agreement with the United States Department of Agriculture to use the existing federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program coupons for the purposes of administering this program. Persons who are members of a household receiving CalFresh benefits under this chapter or under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900), and are receiving CalWORKs benefits under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 on September 1, 1998, shall have eligibility determined under this chapter without need for a new application no later than November 1, 1998, and the beginning date of assistance under this chapter for those persons shall be
 September 1, 1998.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) and Section 18930.5, noncitizens of the United States shall be eligible for the program established pursuant to subdivision (a) if the person’s immigration status meets the eligibility criteria of the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program in effect on August 21, 1996, but the person is not eligible for federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits solely due to the person’s immigration status under Public Law 104-193 and any
 subsequent amendments thereto.

(2) Noncitizens of the United States shall be eligible for the program established pursuant to subdivision (a) if the person is a battered immigrant spouse or child or the parent or child of the battered immigrant, as described in Section 1641(c) of Title 8 of the United States Code, as amended by Section 5571 of Public Law 105-33, or if the person is a Cuban or Haitian entrant as described in Section 501(e) of the federal Refugee Education Assistance Act of 1980 (Public Law 96-122).

(3) An applicant who is otherwise eligible for the program but who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, shall be eligible for aid under this chapter only if the applicant
 is sponsored and one of the following apply:

(A) The sponsor has died.

(B) The sponsor is disabled as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(C) The applicant, after entry into the United States, is a victim of abuse by the sponsor or the spouse of the sponsor if the spouse is living with the sponsor.

(4) An applicant who is otherwise eligible for the program but who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, who does not meet one of the conditions of paragraph (3), shall be eligible for aid under this chapter beginning on October 1, 1999.

(5) The applicant shall be required to provide verification that one of the
 conditions of subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (3) has been met.

(6) For purposes of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3), abuse shall be defined in the same manner as provided in Section 11495.1 and Section 11495.12. A sworn statement of abuse by a victim, or the representative of the victim if the victim is not able to competently swear, shall be sufficient to establish abuse if one or more additional items of evidence of abuse is also provided. Additional evidence may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Police, government agency, or court records or
 files.

(B) Documentation from a domestic violence program, legal, clinical, medical, or other professional from whom the applicant or recipient has sought assistance in dealing with abuse.

(C) A statement from any other individual with knowledge of the circumstances that provided the basis for the claim.

(D) Physical evidence of abuse.
